Missouri, session 2026, HB1879.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.1260, to read as follows:
376.1260. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Cost-sharing requirement", any deductible, coinsurance, co-payment, or
maximum limitation on the application of such deductible, coinsurance, co-payment, or
similar out-of-pocket expense;
(2) "Genetic counseling", the provision of services to individuals, couples,
families, and organizations by one or more appropriately trained individuals to address
the physical and psychological issues associated with the occurrence or risk of
occurrence of a genetic disorder, birth defect, or genetically influenced condition or
disease in an individual or a family;
(3) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning as is ascribed to such term in
section 376.1350;
(4) "Health carrier", the same meaning as is ascribed to such term in section
376.1350.
2. Each health benefit plan delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed
on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for genetic counseling and genetic
testing provided by an individual certified by an accrediting body, recognized by the
department of commerce and insurance, to provide genetic counseling and genetic
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1879 2
testing. The coverage required under this section shall include all costs associated with
genetic counseling and, if indicated after genetic counseling, a genetic laboratory test of
genes for individuals assessed to be at an increased risk, based on a clinical risk
assessment tool, of potentially harmful mutations in genes due to a personal or family
history of cancer.
3. No health benefit plan or health carrier shall consider, or request approval to
consider, the results of any genetic testing or the provision of genetic counseling
provided in accordance with this section in determining eligibility for coverage,
establishing premiums, limiting coverage, renewing coverage, or any other underwriting
decision. A violation of this subsection shall constitute a violation of section 375.1303.
4. No health benefit plan shall impose any cost-sharing requirement with respect
to coverage required under this section. If application of this section would result in
health savings account ineligibility under Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, this section shall apply to health savings account-qualified high
deductible health plans with respect to any cost-sharing under the plans only after an
enrollee has satisfied the minimum deductible under Section 223, except with respect to
items or services that are preventive care under Section 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in which case the requirements of this section shall
apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible under Section 223 has been
satisfied.
✔